District of Columbia statutes.
1-619.02

Limitation upon awards.

A cash award authorized under the provisions of § 1-619.01(a) may not exceed $5,000 or 10% of the employee’s scheduled rate of basic pay, whichever is greater; except, that in the case of suggestions or inventions resulting in a tangible monetary savings or increased revenues, an award shall be based on a percentage formula of the estimated savings or revenues, not to exceed $25,000. No cash award shall be granted to an employee without a written determination by the Mayor or the employee’s independent personnel authority that set forth the specific reasons the award is justified. The written determination shall be forwarded to the Council for its information within 30 days of its execution.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1902, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 24, 1990, D.C. Law 8-97, § 3(d), 37 DCR 1046
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(u)(2), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-620.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-349.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of § 1-620.3 1981 Ed., see § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-120, August 1, 1997, 44 DCR 4643), and see § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-178, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6946).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(u) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-619.01.